North Carolina, session 2025, HB701.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Lafayette Day.
The seventeenth day of May of each year is designated as Lafayette Day in the State of North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 701-First Edition